Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 278.050 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Public Service Commission shall consist of three (3) members appointed by the
Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. If the Senate is not in session
when a term expires or a vacancy occurs, the Governor shall make the appointment
to take effect at once, subject to the approval of the Senate when convened.[
Appointments to the Public Service Commission made more than ninety (90) days
prior to a regular session of the General Assembly shall be subject to confirmation
by the Joint Interim Committee on Energy.] Each of the three (3) members of the
commission shall be appointed on or before the first day of July, 1982, for
staggered terms as follows: one (1) shall serve until the first day of July, 1983, one
(1) until the first day of July, 1984, and one (1) until the first day of July, 1985, and
thereafter for a term of four (4) years and until a successor is appointed and
qualified. Each member of the commission shall be a full-time employee as defined
in KRS 18A.005(17).
(2) The Governor shall appoint one (1) of the commissioners on the commission to act
as chairman thereof and the chairman shall be the chief executive officer of the
commission. The Governor shall designate one (1) of the commissioners on the
commission to serve as vice chairman thereof and act for the chairman in the latter's
absence.
(3) Vacancies for unexpired terms shall be filled in the same manner as original
appointments, but the appointee shall hold office only to the end of the unexpired
term.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/26/2026 2:39 PM Jacketed